Washington statutes.
RCW 19.36.130

Notice required.

If a notice complying with RCW 19.36.140, is not given simultaneously with or before a credit agreement is made, RCW 19.36.100 through 19.36.140 and 19.36.900 shall not apply to the credit agreement. Notice, once given to a debtor, shall be effective as to all subsequent credit agreements and effective against the debtor, and its guarantors, successors, and assigns.

[ 1990 c 211 s 4.]